Utah statutes.
4-2-10.   State chemist responsibilities.

(1)  The state chemist shall:

(a)  serve as the chief administrative officer of the Division of Laboratories; and

(b)  supervise and administer all analytical tests required to be performed under this title or under any rule authorized by it.

(2)  The state chemist may perform analytical tests for other state agencies, federal agencies, units of local government, and private persons if:

(a)  the tests and analytical work do not interfere with, or impede, the work required by the department; and

(b)  a charge commensurate with the work involved is made and collected.

(3)  The state chemist shall perform any other official duties assigned by the commissioner.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2007 General Session

